Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-388
Franchise granted by municipality; exempt from sections.

No community television franchise heretofore or hereafter granted by any municipality under the provisions of Chapter 18, article 22, shall be affected by the provisions of sections 23-383 to 23-388.

Laws 1971, LB 257, § 6.